Hawaii statutes.
[§557A-414] Derivatives and options.
(a) As used in this section, "derivative" means a contract or
financial instrument or a combination of contracts and financial instruments
that gives a trust the right or obligation to participate in some or all changes
in the price of a tangible or intangible asset or group of assets, or changes
in a rate, an index of prices or rates, or other market indicator for an asset
or a group of assets.

(b) To the extent that a trustee does not
account under section 557A-403 for transactions in derivatives, receipts from
and disbursement made in connection with those transactions shall be allocated
to principal.

(c) If a trustee grants an option to buy
property from the trust, whether or not the trust owns the property when the
option is granted, grants an option that permits another person to sell
property to the trust, or acquires an option to buy property for the trust or
an option to sell an asset owned by the trust, and the trustee or other owner
of the asset is required to deliver the asset if the option is exercised, an
amount received for granting the option shall be allocated to principal, and an
amount paid to acquire the option shall be paid from principal. A gain or loss
realized upon the exercise of an option, including an option granted to a
settlor of the trust for services rendered, shall be allocated to principal. [L
2000, c 191, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next